Vermont, session 2025-2026, H434.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 10 V.S.A. § 321 is amended to read:
§ 321. GENERAL POWERS AND DUTIES
* * *
VT LEG #380510 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.434
2025 Page 2 of 3
(e) The Board shall inform all grant applicants and recipients of funds
derived from the annual capital appropriations and State bonding act of the
following: “The Vermont Housing and Conservation Trust Fund is funded by
the taxpayers of the State of Vermont, at the direction of the General
Assembly, through the annual Capital Appropriation and State Bonding Act.”
An appropriate placard shall, if feasible, be displayed at the location of the
proposed grant activity.
(f) All recipients of grant funds and funds derived from the annual capital
appropriations and State bonding act acknowledge that all conservation lands
purchased with any grant funds from this program shall be encumbered with
the following covenants:
(1) that in furtherance of science-based management of the wildlife of
the State of Vermont, hunting, including trapping and fishing, shall be allowed
in accordance with State law and without additional restriction;
(2) that recreational trail systems shall be maintained at or above the
levels of connectivity and trail length existing at the time these funds are used
to purchase parcels;
(3) that should there be an ecological need to remove a trail section, it
shall be replaced with at least an equivalent length of trail and any lost
connectivity shall be reestablished;
VT LEG #380510 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.434
2025 Page 3 of 3
(4) that in the absence of an ecological imperative to the contrary, other
existing recreational infrastructure shall be maintained to, at a minimum, the
levels existing at the time these funds are used to purchase parcels; and
(5) that in the absence of an ecological imperative to the contrary, the
lands shall be managed with timber harvest as an acceptable practice upon
them.
Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2025.
VT LEG #380510 v.1